District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.06

Public information.

(a)

(1)

The Center shall compile information regarding the regulatory programs associated with each of the licenses obtainable under the basic business license system.

(2)

This information shall include a listing of all laws and administrative rules that require the issuance of licenses.

(b)

(1)

The Center shall provide the information required by this section to any person requesting it.

(2)

Materials used by the Center to describe the services provided by the Center shall indicate that this information is available upon request.

(c)

Notwithstanding any other provision of District law, information submitted to the Center under this subchapter shall not be made available to the public; provided, that a person may be furnished with such information for one registrant based upon the submission of either the name or address of the registrant; provided further, that the person shall be limited to one request per day.

(d)

Federal Employer Identification numbers and social security numbers shall not be released to the public, except if:

(1)

Requested by a law enforcement agency; or

(2)

Directed by a court order.

Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 101(b), 45 DCR 1172
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(b), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 2(h), 50 DCR 6913
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Master Business Registration Second Delay Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-83, May 19, 2003, 50 DCR 4100).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Master Business Registration Delay Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-73, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3616).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Master Business Registration Delay Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-595, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 647).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Master Business Registration Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-302, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3776).
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (a)(1), substituted “basic” for “master”; and added subsecs. (c) and (d).
1981 Ed., § 47-2851.6.
This section is referenced in § 2-534.